Utah statutes.
75-7-901.   Prudent investor rule.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a trustee who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in this chapter.  If a trustee is named on the basis of a trustee's representations of special skills or expertise, the trustee has a duty to use those special skills or expertise.

(2)  The prudent investor rule is a default rule and may be expanded, restricted, eliminated, or otherwise altered by the provisions of a trust.  A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary to the extent that the trustee acted in reasonable reliance on the provisions of the trust.

